apertium-eo-en.en.dix
<pardef n="st/ave__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ave</l>                 <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ave</l>                 <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>aves</l>                <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ove</l>                 <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>aved</l>                <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ove</l>                 <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>aved</l>                <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>aving</l>               <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="st/eal__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>eal</l>                 <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eal</l>                 <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eals</l>                <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ole</l>                 <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>olen</l>                <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ealing</l>              <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="step__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ped</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ped</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ping</l>                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="st/ick__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ick</l>                 <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ick</l>                 <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>icks</l>                <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>uck</l>                 <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>uck</l>                 <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>icking</l>              <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="str/ike__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ike</l>                 <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ike</l>                 <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ikes</l>                <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>uck</l>                 <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>uck</l>                 <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>iking</l>               <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sw/ell__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ell</l>                 <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ell</l>                 <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ells</l>                <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>elled</l>               <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>elled</l>               <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>ollen</l>               <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>elling</l>              <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sw/im__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>im</l>                  <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>im</l>                  <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ims</l>                 <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>am</l>                  <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>um</l>                  <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>imming</l>              <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="t/each__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>each</l>                <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>each</l>                <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eachs</l>               <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>aught</l>               <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>aught</l>               <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eaching</l>             <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tr/ead__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ead</l>                 <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ead</l>                 <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eads</l>                <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>od</l>                  <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>od</l>                  <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>odden</l>               <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eading</l>              <r>ead<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="underl/ie__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ie</l>                  <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ie</l>                  <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ies</l>                 <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ay</l>                  <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>aid</l>                 <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ying</l>                <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="w/in__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>in</l>                  <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>in</l>                  <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ins</l>                 <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>on</l>                  <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>on</l>                  <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>inning</l>              <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="drop">                 <i>drop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="equip">                <i>equip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kidnap">               <i>kidnap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pop">                  <i>pop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rip">                  <i>rip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ship">                 <i>ship</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slip">                 <i>slip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="steal">                <i>st</i><par n="st/eal__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stick">                <i>st</i><par n="st/ick__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="step">                 <i>step</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="step in">              <i>step</i><par n="step__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="step into">            <i>step</i><par n="step__vblex"/><p><l><b/>into</l><r><g><b/>into</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="stop">                 <i>stop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="strip">                <i>strip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="swim">                 <i>sw</i><par n="sw/im__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="teach">                <i>t</i><par n="t/each__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tap">                  <i>tap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tip">                  <i>tip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="top">                  <i>top</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trap">                 <i>trap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="win">                  <i>w</i><par n="w/in__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cap">                  <i>cap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="chop">                 <i>chop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="clap">                 <i>clap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="clip">                 <i>clip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cup">                  <i>cup</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dip">                  <i>dip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drip">                 <i>drip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="grip">                 <i>grip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lap">                  <i>lap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lop">                  <i>lop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prop">                 <i>prop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="shop">                 <i>shop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sip">                  <i>sip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skip">                 <i>skip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="snap">                 <i>snap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="strap">                <i>strap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trip">                 <i>trip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="whip">                 <i>whip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="worship">              <i>worship</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wrap">                 <i>wrap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
